West Virginia, session 2026, HB4907.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16A. WEST VIRGINIA PESTICIDE CONTROL ACT. §19-16A-10a. Limitations on pesticides (a) Pesticides that include paraquat or paraquat dichlorate, atrazine, dicamba, chlorpyrifos, 2,4-dichloroacetic acid (2,4-D), glyphosate or perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substances shall not be applied within 1,000 feet of a school.(b) For the purposes of this section, distances shall be measured from the point on the property boundary of a school closest to the property to be sprayed to the area of the property that is to be sprayed.(c) For the purposes of this section, perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substances means a class of fluorinated chemicals that contain at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.(d) This section shall take effect January 1, 2027.